Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 24 Lighting Equipment and Reflectors
31-24-48.
Revocation of certification of lighting equipment.

When the administrator of the division of motor vehicles has reason to believe that an approved device as being sold commercially does not comply with the requirements of this chapter, he or she may, after giving thirty (30) days’ previous notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for the device in this state, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of the approved device. After the hearing the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall determine whether the approved device meets the requirements of this chapter. If the device does not meet the requirements of this chapter, the administrator shall give notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for the device in this state.

If, at the expiration of ninety (90) days after the notice, the person holding the certificate of approval for the device has failed to satisfy the administrator of the division of motor vehicles that the approved device as thereafter to be sold meets the requirements of this chapter, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall suspend or revoke the approval issued for it until or unless the device is resubmitted to and retested by an authorized testing agency and is found to meet the requirements of this chapter, and may require that all the devices sold since the notification following the hearing be replaced with devices that do comply with the requirements of this chapter. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may at the time of the retest purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets of the approved devices, and if the device upon a retest fails to meet the requirements of this chapter, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may refuse to renew the certificate of approval of the device.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-48

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-49.
Approval of lighting equipment required.

No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer or use upon any such vehicle any head lamp, auxiliary or fog lamp, rear lamp, signal lamp, or reflector which reflector is required by this chapter or parts of any of these which tend to change the original design or performance, unless of a type which has been submitted to and approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

(b)

The administrator shall approve a flashing amber light configuration for use in funeral processions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 27; P.L. 1954, ch. 3291, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-49

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121; P.L. 2003, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 436, § 1.

31-24-50.
Trademark or name shown on equipment.

No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer any lamp or device mentioned in §

31-24-49

which has been approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles unless the lamp or device bears on it the trademark or name under which it is approved so as to be legible when installed. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 27; P.L. 1954, ch. 3291, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-50

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-51.
Mounting and adjustment of lamps.

No person shall use upon any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer any lamps mentioned in §

31-24-49

unless the lamps are mounted and adjusted as to focus and aim in accordance with instructions of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 27; P.L. 1954, ch. 3291, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-51

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-52.
Hazard switch for flashing lights.

All new automobiles and automobiles for hire sold in Rhode Island beginning with the 1969 models shall be provided with a hazard switch so as to produce a constant flashing light when the switch is activated. The switch shall be activated by the operator whenever any vehicle becomes disabled on any street or highway. The switch may be attached to the directional signal apparatus.

Nothing in this section shall affect regulations of the interstate commerce commission.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 149, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 69; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-53.
Safety lights required on food vending vehicles.

No person engaged as an itinerant vendor of food items from a motor vehicle operated, or caused to be operated by him or her, upon the public streets or highways of the state of Rhode Island, shall operate the motor vehicle or cause the motor vehicle to be operated for the purpose of vending food items upon the city streets or highways unless the motor vehicle shall have been equipped with two (2) flashing lights, one yellow located on the front bumper and one red on the rear bumper of it, except those vehicles which have flashing warning lights as standard equipment. When the motor vehicle shall have been stopped for the purpose of the intended itinerary business, they shall continue flashing as a warning of its position to all approaching vehicular traffic. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-54.
Strobe lights on school buses.

All new school buses, as defined in §

31-1-3

, shall at all times be equipped with a rear-viewing, rear-mounted white flashing strobe light, meeting the following requirements:

A white flashing strobe light will be installed on the roof of a school bus; at a point not to exceed one-third (1/3) the body length forward from the rear of the roof edge;

The strobe light will have a single clear lens emitting light three hundred sixty (360) degrees around its vertical axis and may not extend above the roof more than maximum legal height;

The light will not exceed nine inches (9") in height or nine inches (9") in diameter;

A manual switch and a pilot light will be included to indicate when light is in operation;

The strobe light will be wired to activate with the amber alternately flashing signal lamps, continuing through the full loading or unloading cycle, with an override switch. The strobe light shall not be activated while the bus is moving; and

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 18; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 16; P.L. 2005, ch. 426, § 1.